Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.900.050

Title, chapter, section headings not part of law.

Title headings, chapter headings, and section or subsection headings, as used in this title, Title 28A RCW, do not constitute any part of the law.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.98.050. Formerly RCW 28A.98.050.]